North Carolina, session 2025, HB500.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The General Assembly of North Carolina hereby ratifies and affirms
the Equal Rights Amendment to the Constitution of the United States of America set forth in this
act.
SECTION 2. A certified copy of this act shall be forwarded by the Governor of this
State to the Archivist of the United States, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the
Speaker of the House of Representatives of the Congress of the United States, and each member
of the North Carolina congressional delegation.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
House Bill 500-First Edition Page 3